Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2639
Compact, how cited.

Sections 29-2639 and 29-2640 shall be known and may be cited as the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 2.
Laws 2003, LB 46, section 51, provided this section became operative "when thirty-five states have adopted the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision". By June 2002, the compact had reached this threshold. (See www.interstatecompact.org.) LB 46 became effective May 24, 2003.